Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3703
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act:

(1) Dialysis patient care technician means a person who meets the requirements of section 38-3705; and

(2) Facility means a health care facility as defined in section 71-413 providing hemodialysis services.

Laws 2017, LB255, § 3.